Mississippi, session 2026, HB4159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Sylvester Montgomery of Copiah County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary-Residential in Copiah County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced on April 26, 1990, to serve five (5) years in the custody of Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On April 19, 1994, he was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of Mississippi Department of Corrections for the crime of Burglary-Residential.  On November 16, 2000, he was sentenced to serve six (6) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for the crime of Embezzlement. He was released on November 21, 2001.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.